Florida, session 2026, HB4037.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1 of section 2 of chapter 2005-322,
Laws of Florida, as amended by chapter 2025-242, Laws of
Florida, is amended to read:
Section 1. Minimum charter requirements.—In accordance
with section 189.031(3) 189.404(3), Florida Statutes, the
following subsections shall comprise the minimum required
charter provisions for Pasco County Mosquito Control District:
(1) The district is organized and exists for all purposes
set forth in this act and chapter 388, Florida Statutes.
(2) The powers, functions, and duties of the district
regarding ad valorem taxation, non-ad valorem assessments, bond
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4037 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4037 2026 Legislature
issuance, other revenue-raising capabilities, budget preparation
and approval, liens, foreclosure of liens, use of tax deeds and
tax certificates, and contractual agreements shall be as set
forth in chapters 170, 189, 197, 200, and 388, Florida Statutes,
this act, or any other applicable general or special law.
(3) The district was created by the petition process
formerly provided for in chapter 390, Florida Statutes (1951),
and now continued in chapter 388, Florida Statutes.
(4) The district's charter may be amended only by special
act of the Legislature, unless otherwise provided by chapter 189
or chapter 388, Florida Statutes.
(5) In accordance with section 388.101(1), Florida
Statutes, the district is governed by a three-member board
elected with staggered terms, and section 189.0312, Florida
Statutes, as may be amended, applies to this subsection, except
that a member of the board may not serve for more than three two
4-year terms, with service of a term of office commencing at a
member's election at or after the November 2026 election.
Notwithstanding section 388.101, Florida Statutes, the following
apply, beginning with the November 2026 election:
(a) The office of each member of the board is designated
as being a seat on the board, distinguished from each of the
other seats by a numeral 1, 2, or 3, which represents designated
geographical subdistricts.
(b) The Pasco County Board of County Commissioners shall
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4037 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4037 2026 Legislature
be responsible for drawing the boundaries of the geographical
subdistricts after providing notice and public hearing as
provided in general law. The geographical subdistricts shall
consist of contiguous and compact territories, nearly equal in
population as is practicable, and shall use existing political
and geographical boundaries. The Pasco County Board of County
Commissioners shall draw initial geographical subdistricts by
January 1, 2026, and following the completion of a decennial
census thereafter. In addition to drawing the initial
geographical subdistricts, the Pasco County Board of County
Commissioners shall also designate each subdistrict by a numeral
1, 2, or 3. The geographical subdistrict designated as Seat 2
shall be the subdistrict that includes all or a majority of the
City of Zephyrhills, and shall be the seat that is on the ballot
for the November 2026 election.
(c) Candidates for the board must qualify as directed by
chapter 99, Florida Statutes. Each candidate must designate, at
the time he or she qualifies, the seat on the board for which he
or she qualifies. Each candidate must reside in the designated
subdistrict, and only electors of the subdistrict are authorized
to vote for the member of that subdistrict. The name of each
candidate who qualifies must be included on the ballot in a way
that clearly indicates the seat for which he or she is a
candidate. The candidate for each seat who receives the most
votes shall be elected to the board.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4037 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4037 2026 Legislature
(d) Each member shall be elected for a term of 4 years and
serve until the member's successor assumes office.
(e) For the length of their terms of office, members of
the board must remain residents and electors of the subdistrict
from which they are elected to represent. However, the
requirements in paragraph (c) and this paragraph relating to
residency and electors voting within a subdistrict do not apply
until the November 2026 election for Seat 2, and until the
November 2028 election for Seats 1 and 3. The membership and
organization of the board shall be as set forth in this act and
chapter 388, Florida Statutes.
(6) Board members may be paid a salary in accordance with
this act and chapter 388, Florida Statutes. Pursuant to section
112.08, Florida Statutes, board members may receive benefits,
such as medical insurance or accidental death and dismemberment
insurance, in addition to the maximum salary allowed under
general law. Each additional benefit shall be granted by
unanimous resolution of the district with all members present.
(7) The administrative duties of the board of
commissioners shall be as set forth in this act and chapter 388,
Florida Statutes.
(8) Requirements for financial disclosure, meeting
notices, reporting, public records maintenance, and per diem
expenses for officers and employees shall be as set forth in
100 chapters 112, 189, 286, and 388, Florida Statutes.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4037 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4037 2026 Legislature
101 (9) The procedures and requirements governing the issuance
102 of bonds, notes, and other evidence of indebtedness by the
103 district shall be as set forth in chapters 189 and 388, Florida
104 Statutes, and applicable general laws.
105 (10) The procedures for conducting district elections and
106 for qualification of electors shall be pursuant to chapters 189
107 and 388, Florida Statutes, and applicable general laws.
108 (11) The district may be financed by any method
109 established in this act, chapter 189 or chapter 388, Florida
110 Statutes, or any applicable general laws.
111 (12) Pursuant to section 388.221, Florida Statutes, the
112 district's authority to levy upon all of the personal and real
113 taxable property in the district a special tax during each year
114 as maintenance tax is preserved.
115 (13) The method for collecting non-ad valorem assessments,
116 fees, service charges, or state matching funds shall be as set
117 forth in chapters 170, 197, and 388, Florida Statutes.
118 (14) The district's planning requirements shall be as set
119 forth in chapters 189 and 388, Florida Statutes.
120 (15) The district's geographic boundary limitations shall
121 be coterminous with the boundaries of Pasco County as defined in
122 section 7.51, Florida Statutes, and may be amended pursuant to
123 section 388.211, Florida Statutes.
124 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4037 -00-er